Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB151.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2149YC (4) 91 nls/ko H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 249A.20A, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 12. a. In establishing and maintaining a 3 preferred drug list, a nonopioid drug approved by the United 4 States food and drug administration for the treatment or 5 management of pain shall not be disadvantaged or discouraged 6 with respect to Medicaid coverage relative to an opioid or 7 narcotic drug for the treatment or management of pain on the 8 preferred drug list. 9 b. Impermissible disadvantaging or discouragement under this 10 subsection includes all of the following: 11 (1) Designating a nonopioid drug for the treatment or 12 management of pain as a nonpreferred drug if any opioid or 13 narcotic drug for the treatment or management of pain is 14 designated as a preferred drug. 15 (2) Establishing more restrictive or more extensive 16 utilization controls, including but not limited to more 17 restrictive or more extensive prior authorization or step 18 therapy requirements for a nonopioid drug for the treatment 19 or management of pain than the least restrictive or extensive 20 utilization controls applicable to an opioid or narcotic drug 21 for the treatment or management of pain. 22 c. This subsection shall apply to a nonopioid drug 23 immediately upon approval of the drug by the United States food 24 and drug administration for the treatment or management of 25 pain, regardless of whether the drug has been reviewed by the 26 medical assistance pharmaceutical and therapeutics committee 27 for inclusion on the preferred drug list. 28 d. This subsection shall apply to drugs being provided under 29 a contract between the department and a Medicaid managed care 30 organization. 31 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 505.36 Health carriers ââ pain 32 management access plans. 33 1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context 34 otherwise requires: 35 -1- LSB 2149YC (4) 91 nls/ko 1/ 5 H.F. _____ a. âCovered personâ means a policyholder, subscriber, 1 enrollee, or other individual participating in a health benefit 2 plan. 3 b. âHealth benefit planâ means a policy, contract, 4 certificate, or agreement offered or issued by a health carrier 5 to provide, deliver, arrange for, pay for, or reimburse any of 6 the costs of health care services. 7 c. âHealth carrierâ means an entity subject to the 8 insurance laws and regulations of this state, or subject 9 to the jurisdiction of the commissioner, including an 10 insurance company offering sickness and accident plans, a 11 health maintenance organization, a nonprofit health service 12 corporation, a plan established pursuant to chapter 509A 13 for public employees, or any other entity providing a plan 14 of health insurance, health care benefits, or health care 15 services. 16 d. âPain management access planâ means a plan developed by 17 a health carrier to provide adequate coverage and access to a 18 broad spectrum of pain management alternatives under a health 19 benefit plan. 20 e. âPain management alternativesâ means alternatives to 21 opioid drugs including but not limited to nonopioid medicinal 22 drugs or drug products for the treatment or management of pain, 23 and nonpharmacologic, nonoperative pain management modalities. 24 2. Pain management access plan. A health carrier shall 25 develop and implement a pain management access plan that 26 satisfies all of the following requirements: 27 a. The plan provides coverage for pain management 28 alternatives including coverage for all of the following: 29 (1) A minimum of two alternative prescription medication 30 treatment options that are approved by the United States food 31 and drug administration for the treatment of pain, and that are 32 not schedule I, II, or III controlled substances. 33 (2) A minimum of three alternative nonpharmacologic 34 treatment modalities. 35 -2- LSB 2149YC (4) 91 nls/ko 2/ 5 H.F. _____ b. The plan does not establish utilization controls, 1 including but not limited to prior authorization or step 2 therapy requirements, for clinically appropriate nonopioid 3 drugs or drug products approved by the United States food 4 and drug administration for the treatment or management of 5 pain, that are more restrictive or extensive than the least 6 restrictive or extensive utilization controls applicable to 7 an opioid or narcotic drug for the treatment or management of 8 pain. 9 3. Filing and review. A health carrier shall file the pain 10 management access plan with the division for approval. In 11 reviewing a plan, the division shall determine if the health 12 carrier is in compliance with the requirements of this section 13 and if any policies adopted by the health carrier may create 14 preferential coverage of, and access to, opioid drugs. 15 4. Plan information. A health carrier shall annually 16 distribute educational materials about the health carrierâs 17 pain management access plan to health care providers in the 18 health carrierâs network, and to the health carrierâs covered 19 persons. The health carrier shall make the pain management 20 access plan publicly available on the health carrierâs internet 21 site. 22 5. Rules. The commissioner of insurance may adopt rules 23 pursuant to chapter 17A to administer this section. 24